New York, session 2025-2026, A8293.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3 of the public officers law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 76 to read as follows: 3 76. In the county of Putnam, the provisions of this section requiring 4 a person to be a resident of the political subdivision or municipal 5 corporation of the state for which such person shall be chosen or 6 within which their official functions are required to be exercised, 7 shall not prevent a person from holding the office of commissioner of 8 finance of the county of Putnam, provided that such person resides in 9 Putnam county or an adjoining county within the state of New York; 10 provided, however that any person performing such functions or holding 11 the office of commissioner of finance in any other county shall be a 12 resident of such county unless otherwise provided by law. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11909-01-5